test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-wapahta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - wâpahta -  : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
  
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: wâpahta
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: wâpahtêtân
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: wâpahtamok
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Sg: wâpahtamôhkan
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Del+12Pl: wâpahtamôhkahk
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Imp+Del+2Pl: wâpahtamôhkêk

     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: niwâpahtên
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kiwâpahtên
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: niwâpahtênân
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kiwâpahtênaw, kiwâpahtênânaw]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kiwâpahtênâwâw
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: wâpahtam
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: wâpahtamwak
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prs+4Pl: wâpahtamiyiwa

     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [êwâpahtamân, ê-wâpahtamân]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [êwâpahtaman, ê-wâpahtaman]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [êwâpahtamâhk, ê-wâpahtamâhk]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [êwâpahtamahk, ê-wâpahtamahk]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [êwâpahtamêk, ê-wâpahtamêk]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [êwâpahtahk, ê-wâpahtahk]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [êwâpahtahkik, ê-wâpahtahkik]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [êwâpahtamiyit, ê-wâpahtamiyit]


     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikîwâpahtên, nikî-wâpahtên]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikîwâpahtên, kikî-wâpahtên]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikîwâpahtênân, nikî-wâpahtênân]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikîwâpahtênaw, kikî-wâpahtênaw, kikîwâpahtênânaw, kikî-wâpahtênânaw]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikîwâpahtênâwâw, kikî-wâpahtênâwâw]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kîwâpahtam, kî-wâpahtam]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-wâpahtamwak, kîwâpahtamwak]
     wâpahtam+V+TI+Ind+Prt+4Pl: [kîwâpahtamiyiwa, kî-wâpahtamiyiwa]
